California statutes. Labor Code
(c) An employee is only entitled to either recover the statutory penalty provided for in this section or to enforce a civil penalty as set forth in subdivision (a) of
 Section 2699, but not both, for the same violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.   (AB 673)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

211.

When action to recover such penalties is brought, no court costs shall be payable by the state or the division. Any sheriff or marshal who serves the summons in the action upon any defendant within his or her jurisdiction shall do so without cost to the division. The sheriff or marshal shall specify in the return what costs he or she would ordinarily have been entitled to for such service, and those costs and the other regular court costs that would have accrued were the action not on behalf of the state shall be made a part of any judgment recovered by the plaintiff and shall be paid out of the first money recovered on the judgment. Several causes of action for the penalties may be united in the same action without being separately stated. A demand is a prerequisite to the bringing of any action under this section or Section 210. The division on behalf of the state may accept and receipt for any penalties so paid, with or without suit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 105.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

212.

(a) No person, or agent or officer thereof, shall issue in payment of wages due, or to become due, or as an advance on wages to be earned:

(1) Any order, check, draft, note, memorandum, or other acknowledgment of indebtedness, unless it is negotiable and payable in cash, on demand, without discount, at some established place of business in the state, the name and address of which must appear on the instrument, and at the time of its issuance and for a reasonable time thereafter, which must be at least 30 days, the maker or drawer has sufficient funds in, or credit, arrangement, or understanding with the drawee for its payment.

(2) Any scrip, coupon, cards, or other thing redeemable, in merchandise or purporting to be payable or redeemable otherwise than in money.

(b) Where an instrument mentioned in subdivision (a) is protested or dishonored, the notice or memorandum of protest or dishonor is admissible as proof of presentation, nonpayment and protest and is presumptive evidence of knowledge of insufficiency of funds or credit with the drawee.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), if the drawee is a bank, the bank’s address need not appear on the instrument and, in that case, the instrument shall be negotiable and payable in cash, on demand, without discount, at any place of business of the drawee chosen by the person entitled to enforce the instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 352, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

213.

Nothing contained in Section 212 shall:

(a) Prohibit an employer from guaranteeing the payment of bills incurred by an employee for the necessaries of life or for the tools and implements used by the employee in the performance of his or her duties.

(b) Apply to counties, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, or school districts.

(c) Apply to students of nonprofit schools, colleges, universities, and other nonprofit educational institutions.

(d) Prohibit an employer from depositing wages due or to become due or an advance on wages to be earned in an account in any bank, savings and loan association, or credit union of the employee’s choice with a place of business located in this state, provided that the employee has voluntarily authorized that deposit. If an employer discharges an employee or the employee quits, the employer may pay the wages earned and unpaid at the time the employee is discharged or quits by making a deposit authorized pursuant to this subdivision, provided that the employer complies with the provisions of this article relating to the payment of wages upon termination or quitting of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

214.

Prosecution under section 212 may be brought either at the place where the alleged illegal order, check, draft, note, memorandum or other acknowledgment of wage indebtedness is issued or at the place where it is made payable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

215.

Any person, or the agent, manager, superintendent or officer thereof, who violates any provision of Section 201.3, 204, 204b, 205, 207, 208, 209, or 212 is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any failure to keep posted any notice required by Section 207 is prima facie evidence of a violation of these sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 169, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

216.

In addition to any other penalty imposed by this article, any person, or an agent, manager, superintendent, or officer thereof is guilty of a misdemeanor, who:

(a) Having the ability to pay, willfully refuses to pay wages due and payable after demand has been made.

(b) Falsely denies the amount or validity thereof, or that the same is due, with intent to secure for himself, his employer or other person, any discount upon such indebtedness, or with intent to annoy, harass, oppress, hinder, delay, or defraud, the person to whom such indebtedness is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

217.

The Division of Labor Law Enforcement shall inquire diligently for any violations of this article, and, in cases which it deems proper, shall institute the actions for the penalties provided for in this article and shall enforce this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

218.

Nothing in this article shall limit the right of any wage claimant to sue directly or through an assignee for any wages or penalty due them under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 659, Sec. 3.   (AB 594)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

218.5.

(a) In any action brought for the nonpayment of wages, fringe benefits, or health and welfare or pension fund contributions, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing party if any party to the action requests attorney’s fees and costs upon the initiation of the action. However, if the prevailing party in the court action is not an employee, attorney’s fees and costs shall be awarded pursuant to this section only if the court finds that the employee brought the court action in bad faith.
 This section shall not apply to an action brought by the Labor Commissioner. This section shall not apply to a surety issuing a bond pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or to an action to enforce a mechanics lien brought under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code.

(b) This section
 does not apply to any cause of action for which attorney’s fees are recoverable under Section 1194.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 42) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 142, Sec. 1.   (SB 462)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

218.6.

In any action brought for the nonpayment of wages, the court shall award interest on all due and unpaid wages at the rate of interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code, which shall accrue from the date that the wages were due and payable as provided in Part 1 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 876, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

218.7.

(a) (1) For contracts entered into between January 1, 2018, and December 31, 2021, inclusive, a direct contractor making or taking a contract in the state for the erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building, structure, or other private work, shall assume, and is liable for, any debt owed to a wage claimant or third party on the wage claimant’s behalf, incurred by a subcontractor at any tier acting under, by, or for the direct contractor for the wage claimant’s performance of labor included in the subject of the contract between the direct contractor and the owner.

(2) The direct contractor’s liability under this section shall extend only to any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, including interest owed
 but shall not extend to penalties or liquidated damages.

(3) A direct contractor or any other person shall not evade, or commit any act that negates, the requirements of this section. This section does not prohibit a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier from establishing by contract or enforcing any otherwise lawful remedies against a subcontractor it hires for liability created by the nonpayment of wages, fringe or other benefit payments, or contributions by that subcontractor or by a subcontractor at any tier working under that subcontractor.

(b) (1) The Labor Commissioner may enforce against a direct contractor the liability for unpaid wages created by subdivision (a) pursuant to Section 98 or 1197.1, or through a civil action. The direct contractor’s liability shall be limited to unpaid wages, including any interest owed.

(2) A third party owed fringe or other benefit payments or contributions on a wage claimant’s behalf may bring a civil action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a). The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff in such an action its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.

(3) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier for unpaid wages owed to a wage claimant by the direct contractor or subcontractor for the performance of private work, including unpaid wages owed by the direct contractor, pursuant to subdivision (a). The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff in such an action its reasonable
 attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees. Prior to commencement of an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a), the committee shall provide the direct contractor and subcontractor that employed the wage claimant with at least 30 days’ notice by first-class mail. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim and shall not limit the liability of the direct contractor or preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.

(4) No other party may bring an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a).

(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, property of the direct contractor may be attached, after trial, for the payment of any judgment received pursuant to this section.

(d) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be filed within one year of the earliest of the following:

(1) Recordation of the notice of completion of the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8182 of the Civil Code.

(2) Recordation of a notice of cessation of the work covered by the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8188 of the Civil Code.

(3) Actual completion of the work covered by the direct contract.

(e) This section does not apply to work performed by an employee of the state, a special district, a city, a county, a city and county, or any political subdivision of the state.

(f) (1) Upon
 request by a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide payroll records, which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174, of its employees who are providing labor on a private work, which payroll records shall be marked or obliterated only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s full social security number, but shall provide the last four digits of the social security number. The payroll records must contain information sufficient to apprise the requesting party of the subcontractor’s payment status in making fringe or other benefit payments or contributions to a third party on the employee’s behalf.

(2) Upon request of a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor
 shall provide the direct contractor award information that includes the project name, name and address of the subcontractor, contractor with whom the subcontractor is under contract, anticipated start date, duration, and estimated journeymen and apprentice hours, and contact information for its subcontractors on the project.

(3) A subcontractor’s failure to comply with this subdivision shall not relieve a direct contractor from any of the obligations contained in this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, “direct contractor” and “subcontractor” have the same meanings as provided in Sections 8018 and 8046, respectively, of the Civil Code.

(h) Nothing in this section shall alter the owner’s obligation to timely pay a direct contractor as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8812 of the Civil Code, or a direct
 contractor’s obligation to timely pay a subcontractor as set forth in Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 8814 of the Civil Code, or the penalties for failing to do so as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8818 of the Civil Code and Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code, except that the direct contractor may withhold as “disputed” all sums owed if a subcontractor does not timely provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.

(i) For any contract entered into on or after January 1, 2019, in order to withhold payments as disputed pursuant to subdivision (h), the direct contractor must specify, in its contract with the subcontractor, the specific documents and information that the direct contractor will require that the subcontractor provide under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f). Subcontractors may include the same requirements
 in their contracts with lower tiered subcontractors and may withhold as disputed all sums owed if a lower tiered subcontractor does not provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.

(j) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 338, Sec. 1.   (SB 727)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

218.8.

(a) (1) For contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2026, a direct contractor making or taking a contract in the state for the erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building, structure, or other private work, shall assume, and is liable for, any debt owed to a wage claimant or third party on the wage claimant’s behalf, incurred by a subcontractor at any tier acting under, by, or for the direct contractor for the wage claimant’s performance of labor included in the subject of the contract between the direct contractor and the owner.

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the direct contractor’s liability under this section
 shall extend to any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor.

(3) The direct contractor’s liability under this section shall extend to penalties and liquidated damages only as follows:

If a worker employed by a subcontractor on a private construction project is not paid the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution owed by the subcontractor on account of the worker’s performance of labor on that project, the direct contractor of the project is not liable for any associated penalties or liquidated damages under paragraph (2) unless the direct contractor had knowledge of the subcontractor’s failure to pay the specified wage, fringe or other benefit
 payment or contribution, or the direct contractor fails to comply with all of the following requirements:

(A) The contractor shall monitor the payment by the subcontractor of wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution to the employees or the labor trust fund, by periodic review of the subcontractor’s payroll records which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174.

(B) Upon becoming aware of the failure of the subcontractor to pay the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution to the employees or the labor trust fund, the contractor shall diligently take corrective action to halt or rectify the failure, including, but not limited to, retaining sufficient funds
 due the subcontractor for work performed on the private construction project.

(C) Prior to making final payment to the subcontractor for work performed on the private construction project, the contractor shall obtain an affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from the subcontractor that the subcontractor has paid the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution due to the employees or the labor trust fund for all work performed on the private construction project.

(4) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall notify the contractor and subcontractor on a private works project within 15 days of the receipt by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of a complaint of the failure of a subcontractor on that private works project to pay the specified
 wage, fringe, or other benefit due to workers.

(5) A direct contractor or any other person shall not evade, or commit any act that negates, the requirements of this section. This section does not prohibit a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier from establishing by contract or enforcing any otherwise lawful remedies against a subcontractor it hires for liability created by the nonpayment of wages, fringe or other benefit payments, or contributions by that subcontractor or by a subcontractor at any tier working under that subcontractor, including liability for associated penalties and liquidated damages.

(b) (1) (A) The Labor Commissioner may enforce against a direct contractor the liability for unpaid wages, liquidated damages, interest,
 and penalties created by subdivision (a) pursuant to Section 98 or 1197.1, or through a civil action.

(B) The Labor Commissioner shall notify the direct contractor and subcontractor at any tier on a private works project at least 30 days prior to a hearing held on an administrative complaint pursuant to Section 98, prior to issuance of a citation pursuant to Section 1197.1, or prior to filing a civil action, for the failure of a subcontractor on that private works project to pay the specified wage, fringe, or other benefit due to workers. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim, the project name or address, and the name of the employer. The notice shall not preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional contractors or wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.

(2) A third party owed fringe or other benefit payments or contributions on a wage claimant’s behalf may bring a civil action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor pursuant to subdivision (a). The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff in such an action its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.

(3) (A) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor
 or
 subcontractor at any tier to enforce liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor on private work pursuant to subdivision (a). Prior to commencement of an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a), the committee shall provide the direct contractor and subcontractor that employed the wage claimant with at least 30 days’ notice by first-class mail. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim, the project name, and the name of the employer, and shall not limit the liability of the direct contractor or preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.

(B) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor to enforce liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the direct contractor on account of the performance of the labor on private work.

(C) In a claim brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.

(4) No other party may bring an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a).

(5) Any liquidated damages awarded by the Labor Commissioner or the court shall be payable to the aggrieved employee.

(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, property of the direct contractor may be attached, after trial, for the payment of any judgment received pursuant to this section.

(d) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be filed within one year of the earliest of the following:

(1) Recordation of the notice of completion of the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8182 of the Civil Code.

(2) Recordation of a notice of cessation of the work covered by the direct contract, pursuant
 to Section 8188 of the Civil Code.

(3) Actual completion of the work covered by the direct contract.

(e) This section does not apply to work performed by an employee of the state, a special district, a city, a county, a city and county, or any political subdivision of the state.

(f) (1) Upon request by a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide payroll records, which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174, of its employees who are providing labor on a private work, which payroll records shall be marked or
 obliterated only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s full social security number, but shall provide the last four digits of the social security number. The payroll records must contain information sufficient to apprise the requesting party of the subcontractor’s payment status in making fringe or other benefit payments or contributions to a third party on the employee’s behalf.

(2) Upon request of a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide the direct contractor award information that includes the project name, name and address of the subcontractor, the contractor with whom the subcontractor is under contract, anticipated start date, duration, and estimated journeymen and apprentice hours, and contact information for its subcontractors
 on the project.

(3) A subcontractor’s failure to comply with this subdivision shall not relieve a direct contractor from any of the obligations contained in this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, “direct contractor” and “subcontractor” have the same meanings as provided in Sections 8018 and 8046, respectively, of the Civil Code.

(h) Nothing in this section shall alter the owner’s obligation to timely pay a direct contractor as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8812 of the Civil Code, or a direct contractor’s obligation to timely pay a subcontractor as set forth in Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 8814 of the Civil Code, or the penalties for failing to do so as set forth in Sections 8800
 and 8818 of the Civil Code and Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code, except that the direct contractor may withhold as “disputed” all sums owed if a subcontractor does not timely provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.

(i) For any contract entered into on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2026, in order to withhold payments as disputed pursuant to subdivision (h), the direct contractor must specify, in its contract with the subcontractor, the specific documents and information that the direct contractor will require that the subcontractor provide under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f). Subcontractors may include the same requirements in their contracts with lower tiered subcontractors and may withhold as disputed all
 sums owed if a lower tiered subcontractor does not provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.

(j) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 774, Sec. 4.   (SB 597)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

218.9.

(a) (1) For contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2026, a direct contractor making or taking a contract in the state for the erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building, structure, or other private work, shall assume, and is liable for, any indebtedness for the performance of labor, including that described in subdivision (b) of Section 8024 of the Civil Code, incurred by a subcontractor at any tier acting under, by,
 or for the direct contractor included in the subject of the contract between the direct contractor and the owner. The direct contractor’s liability under this section shall be limited to payments for labor required by the subcontractor’s agreement with the laborer or the subcontractor’s collective bargaining agreement with the labor organization representing the laborer.

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the direct contractor’s liability under this section shall extend to any indebtedness for labor described in paragraph (1), penalties or liquidated damages, and
 interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor.

(3) The direct contractor’s liability under this section shall extend to penalties and liquidated damages only as follows:

If a worker employed by a subcontractor on a private construction project is not paid the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution owed by the subcontractor on account of the worker’s performance of labor on that project, the direct contractor of the project is not liable for any associated penalties or liquidated damages under paragraph (2) unless the direct contractor had knowledge of the subcontractor’s failure to pay the specified wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, or the direct contractor fails to comply with all of the following requirements:

(A) The contractor shall monitor the payment by the
 subcontractor of wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution to the employees or the labor trust fund, by periodic review of the subcontractor’s payroll records which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174.

(B) Upon becoming aware of the failure of the subcontractor to pay the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution to the employees or the labor trust fund, the contractor shall diligently take corrective action to halt or rectify the failure, including, but not limited to, retaining sufficient funds due the subcontractor for work performed on the private construction project.

(C) Prior to making final payment to the subcontractor for work
 performed on the private construction project, the contractor shall obtain an affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from the subcontractor that the subcontractor has paid the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution due to the employees or the labor trust fund for all work performed on the private construction project.

(4) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall notify the contractor and subcontractor on a private works project within 15 days of the receipt by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of a complaint of the failure of a subcontractor on that private works project to pay the specified wage, fringe, or other benefit due to workers.

(5) A direct contractor or any other person shall not evade, or commit any act that
 negates, the requirements of this section. This section does not prohibit a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier from establishing by contract or enforcing any otherwise lawful remedies against a subcontractor it hires for liability created by any indebtedness for labor described in this subdivision by that subcontractor or by a subcontractor at any tier working under that subcontractor, including liability for associated penalties and liquidated damages.

(b) (1) (A) The Labor Commissioner may enforce against a direct contractor the liability created by subdivision (a) pursuant to Section 98 or 1197.1, or through a civil action.

(B) The Labor Commissioner shall notify the direct contractor and subcontractor at any tier on a private
 works project at least 30 days prior to a hearing held on an administrative complaint pursuant to Section 98, prior to issuance of a citation pursuant to Section 1197.1, or prior to filing a civil action, for the failure of a subcontractor on that private works project to pay the specified wage, fringe, or other benefit due to workers. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim, the project name or address, and the name of the employer. The notice shall not preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional contractors or wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.

(2) A person or entity described in subdivision (c) of Section 8024 of the Civil Code may bring a civil action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution,
 penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor pursuant to subdivision (a). The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff in such an action its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.

(3) (A) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier to enforce liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor on a private work pursuant to subdivision (a). Prior to commencement of an
 action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a), the committee shall provide the direct contractor and subcontractor that employed the wage claimant with at least 30 days’ notice by first-class mail. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim, the project name, and the name of the employer, and shall not limit the liability of the direct contractor or preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.

(B) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor to enforce liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution,
 penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the direct contractor on account of the performance of the labor on private work.

(C) In a claim brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.

(4) No other party may bring an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a).

(5) Any liquidated damages awarded by the Labor Commissioner or the court shall be payable to the aggrieved employee.

(6) An action pursuant to this section shall not be based on the employer’s misclassification of the craft of a
 worker.

(7) The remedies created by this section are cumulative of any other available remedies.

(8) (A) A direct contractor that makes contribution payments pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall not be held liable pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, with respect to fringe or other benefit contributions.

(B) If a direct contractor has been provided documentation that the subcontractor has been notified by the trust, plan, fund, or program that the subcontractor has failed to make timely required contribution payments for a private construction project, the direct contractor may make the contribution payments for performance of labor for that project in compliance with all of the following:

(i) The direct contractor makes a payment using a joint check made payable to the subcontractor and the trust, plan, fund, or program for any fringe or other benefit payment or contribution.

(ii) The subcontractor provides the name, type, number, and address of the trust, plan, fund, or program to the direct contractor.

(iii) The direct contractor notifies the trust, plan, fund, or program that it has paid the subcontractor with a joint check.

(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, property of the direct contractor may be attached, after trial, for the payment of any judgment received pursuant to this section.

(d) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be filed within one year of the earliest of the following:

(1) Recordation of the notice of completion of the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8182 of the Civil Code.

(2) Recordation of a notice of cessation of the work covered by the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8188 of the Civil Code.

(3) Actual completion of the work covered by the direct contract.

(e) This section does not apply to work performed by an employee of the state, a special district, a city, a county, a city and county, or any political subdivision of the state.

(f) (1) Upon request by a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide payroll records, which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174, of its employees who are providing labor on a private work, which payroll records shall be marked or obliterated only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s full social security number, but shall provide the last four digits of the social security number. The payroll records must contain information sufficient to apprise the requesting party of the subcontractor’s payment status in making fringe or other benefit payments or contributions to a third party on the employee’s behalf.

(2) Upon request of a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide the direct contractor award information that includes the project name, name and address of the subcontractor, the contractor with whom the subcontractor is under contract, anticipated start date, duration, and estimated journeymen and apprentice hours, and contact information for its subcontractors on the project.

(3) A subcontractor’s failure to comply with this subdivision shall not relieve a direct contractor from any of the obligations contained in this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Direct
 contractor” means a contractor that has a direct contractual relationship with an owner or any other person or entity engaging contractors or subcontractors for the erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building, structure, or other private work on behalf of the owner.

(2) “Subcontractor” has the same meaning as provided in Section 8046 of the Civil Code.

(h) Nothing in this section shall alter the owner’s obligation to timely pay a direct contractor as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8812 of the Civil Code, or a direct contractor’s obligation to timely pay a subcontractor as set forth in Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 8814 of the Civil Code, or the penalties for failing to do so as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8818 of the
 Civil Code and Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code, except that the direct contractor may withhold as “disputed” all sums owed if a subcontractor does not timely provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.

(i) For any contract entered into on or after January 1, 2026, in order to withhold payments as disputed pursuant to subdivision (h), the direct contractor must specify, in its contract with the subcontractor, the specific documents and information that the direct contractor will require that the subcontractor provide under
 paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f). Subcontractors may include the same requirements in their contracts with lower tiered subcontractors and may withhold as disputed all sums owed if a lower tiered subcontractor does not provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.

(j) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 774, Sec. 5.   (SB 597)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

219.
